Utah statutes.
59-2-904.   Participation by district in state's contributions to state-supported levy program.

(1)  In addition to the basic state contribution provided in Section 59-2-902, a school district may participate in the state's contributions to the state-supported levy program by conforming to the requirements of the Minimum School Program Act and by making the required additional levy. 

(2)  A school district that participates in the state-supported levy program shall certify to the State Board of Education the results of its determination and the amount of the board or voted local levy that the district will impose.

